Delaware, session 153, SB41.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 33, Title 16 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 3325. Red dye 3 prohibited in food. (a) For purposes of this section, âfoodâ means as defined in Â§ 3301 of this title, except that it only includes articles for consumption by humans. (b) Notwithstanding Â§Â§ 3311, 3313, or 3314 of this title, a person may not manufacture, sell, deliver, distribute, hold with the intent to sell, or offer for sale in this State food that contains Red dye 3 (CAS no. 16423-68-0). (c) A person that violates subsection (b) of this section is subject to a civil penalty as follows: (1) For a first occurrence, not to exceed $5,000, in addition to costs. (2) For a subsequent occurrence, not to exceed $10,000, in addition to costs. (d) Each day on which a violation of subsection (b) of this section occurs is a separate occurrence under subsection (c) of this section. Section 2. This Act takes effect on January 15, 2027.